Tennessee, session 114, SB2567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 59-8-205(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "and" at the end of subdivision (F), by deleting the period at the end of subdivision (G)
and substituting "; and", and by adding the following as a new subdivision:
(H) Documentation, from the county or counties in which the proposed project is
located, certifying that the project is in compliance with all relevant zoning laws of such
county or counties.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-3-108(g)(4), is amended by
deleting "and" at the end of subdivision (D), by deleting the period at the end of subdivision
(E)(iv) and substituting "; and", and by adding the following as a new subdivision:
(F) Documentation, from the county or counties in which the proposed project is
located, certifying that the project is in compliance with all relevant zoning laws of such
county or counties.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to all permit applications submitted on and after such date.
SB2567
012559
- 1 -